California statutes. Education Code
(c) Moneys in the State University Continuing Education Revenue Fund may be invested by the Treasurer, upon approval of the trustees, in those eligible securities listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code. All interest or other earnings received pursuant to the investments shall be
 deposited to the credit of the State University Continuing Education Revenue Fund.

(d) All revenues received by the trustees under this section may be pledged for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of facilities for extension programs, special session, and other self-supporting instructional programs pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 (Article 2 (commencing with Section 90010) of Chapter 8), and may also be pledged to supplement other revenue funded projects relating to debt obligations issued by the trustees pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947.

(e) On or before March 31 of each year, the California State University shall submit a report on the implementation of
 this section to the Department of Finance and, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The total amount of revenue generated from extension programs, special session, or self-supporting instructional programs in the prior three fiscal years, by campus.

(2) Of the amounts identified in paragraph (1), the amount transmitted to the Treasurer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and the amount transmitted to the chief fiscal officer of each campus pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(3) The total amount of expenditures from revenue generated from extension programs, special session, or self-supporting instructional programs in the prior three fiscal
 years and the purposes for which those funds were expended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 828, Sec. 1.   (AB 2395)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

89705.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), and as otherwise specially provided, an admission fee and rate of tuition fixed by the trustees shall be required of each nonresident student. The rate of tuition to be paid by each nonresident student, as defined in Section 68018, shall not be less than three hundred sixty dollars ($360) per year. The rate of tuition paid by each nonresident student who is a citizen and resident of a foreign country and not a citizen of the United States, except as otherwise specifically provided, shall be fixed by the trustees and shall not be less than three hundred sixty dollars ($360) per year.

(b) The trustees may waive entirely, or reduce below the rate, or the minimum rate, fixed by this section, the tuition fee of a nonresident
 student who is a citizen and resident of a foreign country and who attends a state university or college under an agreement entered into by a governmental agency or a nonprofit corporation or organization with a similar agency, or corporation or association, domiciled in and organized under laws of a foreign country, where a principal purpose of the agreement is to encourage the exchange of students with the view of enhancing international good will and understanding. The trustees shall, in each instance, determine whether the conditions for this exemption from fees exist and may prescribe appropriate procedures to be complied with in obtaining the exemption.

(c) The trustees shall waive entirely the admission fee and rate of tuition fixed under this section for a nonresident student who is a United States citizen who resides in a foreign country, if that nonresident meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Demonstrates a financial need for the exemption.

(2) Has a parent or guardian who has been deported or was permitted to depart voluntarily under the federal Immigration and Nationality Act in accordance with Section 1229c of Title 8 of the United States Code. The student shall provide documents from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services evidencing the deportation or voluntary departure of the student’s parent or guardian.

(3) Moved abroad as a result of the deportation or voluntary departure specified in paragraph (2).

(4) Lived in California immediately before moving abroad. The student shall provide information and evidence that demonstrates the student previously lived in California.

(5) Attended a public or private secondary school, as described in Sections 52 and 53, in the state for three or more years. The student shall provide documents that demonstrate the student’s secondary school attendance.

(6) Upon enrollment, will be in the student’s first academic year as a matriculated student in California public higher education, as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 66010, will be living in California, and will file an affidavit with the institution stating that the student intends to establish residency in California as soon as possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 110, Sec. 2.   (SB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

89706.

(a) The trustees may, on the basis of demonstrated financial need and scholastic achievement, waive entirely, or reduce below the rate, or the minimum rate, fixed by Section 89705, the tuition fee of a nonresident student, as defined in Section 68018, who is a citizen and resident of a foreign country, who is an undergraduate student of exceptional scholastic ability and prior scholastic achievement, and who is enrolled in a full-time course of study.

(b) The number of reductions and waivers granted by the trustees under this section shall at no time exceed 7.5 percent of the nonresident undergraduate students who are citizens and residents of a foreign country, then enrolled in the California State
 University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 110, Sec. 3.   (SB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

89707.

(a) The trustees may, on the basis of demonstrated financial need and scholastic achievement, waive entirely, or reduce below the rate, or the minimum rate, fixed by Section 89705, the tuition fee of a nonresident student or a nonresident student, as defined in Section 68018, who is a citizen and resident of a foreign country, who is a graduate student of exceptional scholastic ability and prior scholastic achievement, and who, while not employed full time by a state university, is employed 20 hours or more a week by a state university or is enrolled in a full-time course of study.

(b) The number of reductions and waivers granted by the trustees under this section shall at no time exceed 25 percent of the nonresident graduate
 students, including nonresident graduate students who are citizens and residents of a foreign country, then enrolled in the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 110, Sec. 4.   (SB 701)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

89707.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 89301, a nonresident student who is a citizen and resident of a foregin country and not a citizen of the United States may pay the nonresident tuition fee required of such students in three equal installments per semester if attending on the semester system or in two equal installments per quarter if attending on the quarter system. Any such student shall pay all registration fees required of resident students by the same date as required for resident students. The first installment of the nonresident tuition fee for a nonresident student who is a citizen and resident of a foreign country and not a citizen of the United States shall be due no sooner than 30 days following the deadline for payment of registration fees by resident students. The trustees shall establish an appropriate payment schedule for payment of the nonresident tuition fee and may assess a service charge to finance the cost of administering this installment plan consistent with the provisions of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89708.

(a) Tuition fees adequate, in the long run, to meet the cost of maintaining special sessions in the California State University shall be required of, and collected from, students enrolled in each special session pursuant to rules and regulations prescribed by the trustees.

(b) “Special sessions,” as used in this division, means self-supporting instructional programs conducted by the California State University. The special sessions shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, career enrichment and retraining programs. It is the intent of the Legislature that those programs, currently offered on a self-supporting basis by the California State University during summer sessions, may be provided throughout the year, and shall be known as special sessions. The
 self-supporting special sessions shall not supplant, as defined in subdivision (c), regular course offerings available on a non-self-supporting basis during the regular academic year.

(c) “Supplant,” as used in this section, means reducing the number of state-supported course offerings while increasing the number of self-supporting versions of that course.

(d) To the extent possible, each campus shall ensure that any course required as a condition of undergraduate degree completion for a state-supported matriculated student shall be offered as a state-supported course. A campus shall not require a state-supported matriculated student to enroll in a special session course in order to fulfill a graduation requirement for a state-supported degree program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 77.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

89709.

The trustees may require and collect special fees to cover cost of materials for specific services and other fees to cover the cost of accommodation services and other services provided students from students enrolled in each special session.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89710.

To enhance the opportunities for California State University employees to participate in training and career development the trustees may, subject to the rules and regulations they may establish, waive entirely or reduce any or all fees for employees who enroll in work-related courses offered by the California State University necessary for improving skills for existing jobs or advancement in accordance with a career development plan at the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 144.)
-------------------------------------------

89711.

(a) Except as provided for in subdivision (b), a California State University campus-based mandatory fee established through an affirmative vote of the majority of the student body voting on the fee, but not specifically authorized by statute, shall not be reallocated without an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of either the student body or a campus fee advisory committee established under the policies of the California State University voting on the fee reallocation.

(b) A California State University campus-based mandatory fee established through an
 affirmative vote of the majority of the student body voting on the fee, but not specifically authorized by statute, may be reallocated without an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of either the student body or a campus fee advisory committee voting on the fee if the vote that established the fee authorized an alternative or automatic reallocation mechanism for that fee.

(c) This section shall not apply to campus-based fees approved prior to the enactment of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 574, Sec. 1.   (SB 960)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

89712.

(a) (1) Neither a campus of the California State University, nor the Chancellor of the California State University shall approve a new student success fee or an increase to an existing student success fee, as defined in subdivision (g), before all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(A) The campus undertakes a rigorous consultation process that informs and educates students on the uses, impact, and cost of any proposed student success fee or student success fee increase.

(B) The campus informs its students of all of the following circumstances, which shall apply to these fees:

(i) That, except as provided in
 clauses (ii) and (iii), a student success fee may be rescinded by a majority vote of the students, as specified in subdivision (c).

(ii) That a student success fee shall not be rescinded earlier than six years following the vote to implement the fee.

(iii) If any portion of the student success fee is committed to support a long-term obligation, that portion of the fee shall not be rescinded until the obligation has been satisfied.

(C) The campus shall hold a binding student election on the implementation of any proposed student success fees, or any increase to an existing student success fee, and a majority of the student body voting on the fee must vote affirmatively.

(2) Implementation of a fee supported by a majority of the campus student body voting
 on the fee is contingent upon the final approval of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(3) A student success fee proposal shall not be brought before the student body more frequently than once per academic year.

(b) A student success fee in place on January 1, 2016, may be rescinded by a binding student vote under the procedures authorized in subdivision (c) only after at least six years have elapsed following the implementation of the fee.

(c) (1) Student success fees may be rescinded with a binding student vote if a simple majority of those students voting vote to rescind the fee. The student vote shall comply with all of the following:

(A) A campus decision to vote is formally approved by the recognized student
 government.

(B) Rescission vote proposals shall not be brought before the student body more frequently than once per academic year.

(C) In the process of reconsidering a student success fee, and before the student vote occurs, the students shall be informed, if a portion of the fee is supporting a long-term obligation, the dollar amount of that portion, and the date on which the long-term obligation would be satisfied.

(2) A new contractual or other obligation that would be supported by the rescinded student success fee shall not be entered into following a vote to rescind the fee.

(d) The Chancellor of the California State University shall ensure that all of the following occur on each campus:

(1) There is majority student representation in campus student success fee allocation oversight groups.

(2) There is an annual report from each campus to the chancellor on student success fees.

(3) There is uniform, transparent, online accountability in the decisionmaking process for, and a detailed accounting of, the allocation of student success fees.

(e) The Chancellor of the California State University shall establish appropriate reporting procedures to ensure that a campus is in compliance with the requirements of this section.

(f) The chancellor shall report, by December 1 of each year, to the Department of Finance, and the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, a summary of the fees adopted or rescinded in the
 prior academic year, and the uses of proposed and currently implemented fees.

(g) For purposes of this section, a “student success fee” is a type of category II campus-based mandatory fee that is required to be paid by a student before that student may enroll or attend a campus of the California State University, as determined by that campus or the Chancellor of the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 78.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Revenues [89720. - 89726.]

89720.

The trustees may accept on behalf of the state any gift, bequest, devise, or donation of real or personal property whenever the gift and the terms and conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the primary functions of the California State University as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 66010.4. Neither Section 11005 of the Government Code nor any other law requiring approval by a state officer of gifts, bequests, devises, or donations shall apply to these gifts, bequests, devises, or donations. These gifts, bequests, devises, or donations, and the disposition thereof, shall be annually reported to the California Postsecondary Education Commission, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Finance by
 January 31 of each year.

Notwithstanding Sections 11005.2 and 14664 of the Government Code or any other law to the contrary, the trustees may sell or exchange interests in real property received pursuant to this section when, in the judgment of the trustees, the sale or exchange is in the best interests of the California State University. No sale or exchange of an interest in real property made pursuant to this section shall exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000) per transaction.

Notwithstanding Sections 11005 and 15853 of the Government Code or any other provision of law to the contrary, the trustees may purchase interests in real property from moneys received pursuant to this section, including those moneys received from the sale or exchange of interests in real property pursuant to this section. Any such
 purchase shall be consistent with any restrictions placed upon the gift, bequest, devise, or donation and shall be in the best interests of the California State University, as determined by the trustees.

No interest in any real property that is part of a main campus of any of the institutions of the California State University listed in Section 89001 shall be sold or exchanged pursuant to this section.

Any sale or exchange of interests in real property carried out pursuant to this section shall be reported annually to the California Postsecondary Education Commission or a successor agency, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the Department of Finance, by January 31 of each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 511, Sec. 4.   (AB 2736)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

89720.5.

Prior to the sale of any interests in real property pursuant to Section 89720, the trustees shall offer the interests to local governmental agencies. It is the intent of the Legislature that the trustees may transfer interests at less than fair market value under the conditions described in Section 11011.1 of the Government Code, except that all powers and duties of the Director of General Services, the Department of General Services, and the State Public Works Board under that section shall be performed by the trustees.

For purposes of this section, “local governmental agencies” shall not include private entities, private nonprofit entities, private tax exempt entities, or any consortium, cooperative, or combination of private-public entities or organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 319, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89721.

Notwithstanding any other law, the chief fiscal officer of each campus of the California State University shall deposit into and maintain in local trust accounts or in trust accounts in accordance with Sections 16305 to 16305.7, inclusive, of the Government Code, or in the California State University Trust Fund, moneys received in connection with the following sources or purposes:

(a) Gifts, bequests, devises, and donations received under Section 89720.

(b) Any student loan or scholarship fund program,
 including, but not limited to, student loan programs of the state, federal government, including programs referred to in Section 89723, local government, or private sources.

(c) Advance payment for anticipated expenditures or encumbrances in connection with federal grants or contracts.

(d) Room, board, and similar expenses of students enrolled in the international program of the California State University.

(e) Cafeteria replacement funds.

(f) Miscellaneous receipts in the nature of deposits subject to
 return upon approval of a proper application.

(g) Fees and charges for services, materials, and facilities authorized by Section 89700 if these fees or charges are required of those persons who, at their option, use the services or facilities, or are provided the materials, for which the fees or charges are made. Fees and charges so received and deposited shall be used solely to meet the costs of providing these services, materials, and facilities.

(h) Fees for instructionally related activities as defined by the trustees and as authorized by Section 89700 and revenues derived from the conduct of the instructionally related activities. The trustees shall have all authority necessary to administer and use the fees and revenues received and deposited to support such instructionally
 related activities.

(i) Fees for parking, health facilities or health services, and for extension programs, special sessions, or self-supporting instructional programs.

(j) Revenue received by the trustees from the California State Lottery Education Fund pursuant to Section 8880.5 of the Government Code.

(k) Moneys received by the trustees for research, workshops, conferences, institutes, and special projects.

(l) Moneys collected as higher education fees and income from students of any campus of the California State University and from other persons pursuant to Section 89700. The Controller shall have the authority to audit the expenditure of these
 funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 828, Sec. 2.   (AB 2395)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

89722.

(a) The California State University Trust Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the California State University Trust Fund are appropriated to the trustees as provided in Section 89724. Interest accruing upon the investment of moneys of the California State University Trust Fund shall be paid into and credited to that fund. The trustees shall apportion as of June 30 and December 31 of each year the revenues earned and deposited in the fund during the six calendar months ending with those dates. There shall be apportioned and credited to each campus of the California State University having deposits in the fund, an amount directly proportionate to the total deposits in the fund and the length of time the deposits remained therein. The chief fiscal officer of each campus of the California State University may allocate further this amount to the extent considered necessary.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the California State University Trust Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the California State University Trust Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the California State University Trust Fund was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 2.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

89722.5.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the California State University Lottery Education Fund. Moneys received by the Trustees of the California State University from the California State Lottery Education Fund pursuant to Section 8880.5 of the Government Code may be deposited and maintained in the fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year for expenditure by the trustees for educational purposes pursuant to Section 8880.5 of the Government Code. All expenditures from the fund shall be subject to an annual postaudit by the Audits Division of the State Department of Finance.

(b) Pending expenditure for educational purposes, the moneys in the fund may be invested by the Treasurer, subject to the approval of the trustees, in those eligible securities listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code. All interest accruing from any investment pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited into, and credited to, the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   Effective September 16, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

89722.9.

Notwithstanding Sections 16305 to 16305.7, inclusive, of the Government Code and any other law to the contrary, financial aid money in the possession of the California State University may be deposited by the chief fiscal officer of each campus of the California State University in a checking account in the centralized treasury system. The funds in the checking account shall be invested by the Treasurer. Interest earned thereon shall be deposited in the California State University Trust Fund. The interest earnings shall be continuously appropriated for expenditure by the Trustees of the California State University for financial aid, except that the interest earned from the investment of federal financial aid moneys may be returned to the United States if required by applicable federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 154, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89723.

The trustees are vested with all necessary power to perform acts, receive and expend funds, and cooperate with state and federal agencies as provided in Section 12400 for the purpose of receiving and spending the funds provided by the act of Congress entitled “An act to strengthen the national defense and to encourage and assist in the expansion and improvement of educational programs to meet critical national needs; and for other purposes” (National Defense Education Act of 1958), approved September 2, 1958, and the act of Congress entitled “An act to amend the Public Health Service Act to increase the opportunities for training professional nursing personnel, and for other purposes” (Nurse Training Act of 1964), approved September 4, 1964.

The trustees may provide for the establishment and maintenance of student loan funds pursuant to those acts of Congress. Money allocated for the purpose of establishing a student loan fund at a campus of the California State University may be withdrawn from the State Treasury and deposited to the credit of that institution in a trust account in accordance with the provisions of Sections 16305 to 16305.7, inclusive, of the Government Code for the purpose of making loans to students in accordance with the federal acts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 146.)
-------------------------------------------

89724.

(a) All money received in accordance with the following shall be appropriated for the support of the California State University in addition to other amounts as may be appropriated by the Legislature:

(1) All money received from the sale of California State University publications.

(2) All money received under an agreement entered into pursuant to Section 89036.

(3) Except as to the fees and charges specified in subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 89721, all money collected as fees from students of the California State University and received from other persons
 under Sections 89030, 89036 to 89039, inclusive, 89700, 89705, 89708, 89709, 89720, and 89721, and money received pursuant to Section 2080.8 of the Civil Code.

(b) (1) Money received under Sections 89720 and 89721, or received pursuant to Section 2080.8 of the Civil Code, is appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) without regard to fiscal year.

(2) Money received pursuant to Section 2080.8 of the Civil Code shall be used for student scholarships and loans pursuant to any regulations the trustees provide.

(3) Money received pursuant to Sections 89720 and 89721 may be invested, upon approval of the trustees, by the Treasurer or by the chief fiscal officer of a campus of the California State University,
 in those eligible securities listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code.

(4) (A) Money received under Sections 89720 and 89721, and received pursuant to Section 2080.8 of the Civil Code, may be invested, upon approval of the trustees and in accordance with Section 89726, by the chief fiscal officer of a campus of the California State University, in any of the following:

(i) Mutual funds subject to registration by, and under the regulatory authority of, the United States Securities and Exchange
 Commission.

(ii) Publicly traded real estate investment trusts registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(iii) Institutional commingled funds, including commingled trust funds and collective trust funds, offered by investment advisors registered with, and under the regulatory authority of, the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(iv) Exchange-traded funds subject to registration by, and under the regulatory authority of, the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(B) All interest and other earnings received pursuant to the investment of money received pursuant to Sections 89720 and 89721 shall also be used for purposes established by the trustees consistent with the terms and conditions of the gift, bequest, devise, donation, or agreement under Sections 89720 and 89721.

(5) Except as otherwise provided with respect to money received pursuant to Section 2080.8 of the Civil Code and Sections 89720 and 89721, all money received pursuant to this section shall augment the support appropriation to the California State University for the fiscal year to which the collections apply.

(c) All money received from the sale or the disposition of real property acquired by or on behalf of a campus of the California State University by gift, devise, or donation pursuant to Section 89720 or pursuant to the predecessor of that section is hereby appropriated to the trustees for expenditure for capital outlay for the acquisition and improvement of real property for the campus, in addition to any other amounts appropriated by the Legislature. All money received from the sale or other disposition of personal property, other than money, acquired by or on behalf of a campus of the California State University by gift, bequest, or donation pursuant to Section 89720 or the predecessor of that section is hereby appropriated to the trustees for expenditure for capital outlay for, or the acquisition and improvement of real or personal property
 for, the campus, in addition to other amounts appropriated by the Legislature. No money shall be expended by the trustees under this subdivision without the approval of the Director of Finance. The money shall augment the support or capital outlay appropriation of the California State University current at the date of issuance of the Controller’s receipt as may be designated by the trustees before the deposit of that money in the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 530, Sec. 1.   (AB 2422)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

89725.

(a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, grants, revenues, and funds of any nature received by the trustees for research, workshops, conferences, institutes, and special projects from the state, federal government, local government, or private persons, may be transmitted to the Treasurer and, if transmitted, shall be deposited in the California State University Special Projects Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(b) All grants, revenues, and funds deposited in the California State University Special Projects Fund are appropriated without regard to fiscal year to the trustees for the operation, support, and development of research, workshops, conferences, institutes,
 and special projects in the California State University.

(c) Provision shall be made by the trustees for reimbursements to the General Fund for the cost of space and services furnished to projects funded by the California State University Special Projects Fund.

(d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the trustees shall have authority to establish the rules and procedures under which the fund shall operate. All expenditures shall be made in accordance with the rules and procedures, without prior approval of the Department of General Services or the Department of Finance. Expenditures from the fund shall be audited as frequently as the Audits Division of the Department of Finance deems appropriate.

(e) (1) Moneys in the California State University Special Projects Fund may be invested by the Treasurer or by the chief fiscal officer of a campus of the California State University, upon approval of the trustees, only in eligible securities listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code, or, in accordance with Section 89726, in any of the following:

(A) Mutual funds subject to registration by, and under the regulatory authority of, the United States Securities and Exchange
 Commission.

(B) Publicly traded real estate investment trusts registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(C) Institutional commingled funds, including commingled trust funds and collective trust funds, offered by investment advisors registered with, and under the regulatory authority of, the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(D) Exchange-traded funds subject to registration by, and under the regulatory authority of, the United States Securities and Exchange Commission.

(2) All interest or other earnings received pursuant to those investments described in paragraph (1) shall be collected by the Treasurer, and shall be deposited in the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 530, Sec. 2.   (AB 2422)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

89725.1.

Moneys received from the sale of interests in real property of the California State University in Contra Costa County shall be deposited and maintained in the State Treasury to the credit of the California State University Special Projects Fund and shall be available to the trustees for the purchase and development of real property for a California State University off campus center in Contra Costa County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 985, Sec. 1.   Effective September 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

89726.

(a) (1) The trustees may invest in securities or investments not listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code only if the trustees have established a committee to provide advice and expertise on investments.

(2) A majority of the members of the committee shall be individuals who have investment expertise and who are not employees of the California State University.

(3) The trustees shall allow the Treasurer to serve as a member of the committee or to appoint a deputy treasurer to serve as a member of the committee.

(b) The total amount invested in securities
 or investments not listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code shall not exceed the following amounts:

(1) In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, 30 percent of all moneys invested pursuant to Sections 89724 and 89725.

(2) In the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, and each fiscal year thereafter, 65 percent of all moneys invested pursuant to Sections 89724 and 89725.

(c) (1) The trustees shall receive an investment performance report quarterly and distribute an annual report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and the Department of Finance.

(2) The investment performance reports shall include investment
 returns, comparisons to benchmarks, holdings, market values, and fees.

(d) Any additional moneys earned through investments in securities or investments not listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code shall be used only for capital outlay or maintenance, and shall not be used for ongoing operations.

(e) The trustees shall not submit a request to the Department of Finance or the Legislature for any funds to compensate for investment loss resulting from investments in securities or investments not listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code.

(f) The trustees shall not cite investment loss resulting from investments in securities or investments not listed in Section 16430 of the Government Code to justify approval of an
 increase in student tuition or fees. No increase in tuition or reduction in course sections offered shall be adopted because of investment losses sustained as a result of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 530, Sec. 3.   (AB 2422)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Expenditures and Control [89750. - 89762.]

89750.

The trustees shall control and expend all money appropriated for the support and maintenance of the California State University, and all money received as donations pursuant to Section 89720.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 150.)
-------------------------------------------

89750.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 948 and 965.2 of the Government Code or any other law, the trustees may settle, adjust, or compromise any pending action or final judgment, without the need for a recommendation, certification, or approval from any other state officer or entity. The Controller shall draw a warrant for the payment of any settlement, adjustment, or compromise, or final judgment against the trustees if the trustees certify that a sufficient appropriation for the payment of the settlement, adjustment, compromise, or final judgment exists.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 905.2 of the Government Code or any other law, the trustees may pay any claim for money or damages on express
 contract or for an injury for which the trustees or their officers or employees are liable, without approval of the Department of General Services, if the trustees determine that payment of the claim is in the best interests of the California State University and that funds are available to pay the claim. The authority of the trustees conferred by this subdivision does not alter any other requirements governing claims in the Government Claims Act (Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code), except to grant the trustees authority to pay these claims.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13940) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the trustees may discharge from accountability the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, owing to the California State University, if the trustees determine that the money is uncollectible or the amount does not justify the cost of
 collection. A discharge of accountability by the trustees does not release any person from the payment of any moneys due the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

89751.

The State Treasurer is designated as the custodian of all funds received by the state from the government of the United States or of any agency or agencies thereof under any agreement for the education of veterans, and he may receive, and provide for the proper custody of, all money so received.
